Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROJECTS; BRAINERD PUBLIC UTILITIES; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $9,900,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to Brainerd Public Utilities for energy efficiency projects. The appropriation under this section is available until expended. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of this section, "energy efficiency project" includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) upgrades to existing turbine generators; new text end new text begin (2) replacing existing turbine generators with new units; or new text end new text begin (3) improvements to existing structures to accommodate new turbine generators. new text end